Vermont statutes. Title 14A Trusts
Chapter 7. Office of Trustee

§ 701.
Accepting or declining trusteeship.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c) of this section, a person designated as trustee accepts the trusteeship:

by substantially complying with a method of acceptance provided in the terms of the trust; or

if the terms of the trust do not provide a method or the method provided in the terms is not expressly made exclusive, by accepting delivery of the trust property, exercising powers or performing duties as trustee, or otherwise indicating acceptance of the trusteeship.

A person designated as trustee who has not yet accepted the trusteeship may reject the trusteeship. A designated trustee who does not accept the trusteeship within a reasonable time after knowing of the designation is deemed to have rejected the trusteeship.

A person designated as trustee, without accepting the trusteeship, may:

act to preserve the trust property if, within a reasonable time after acting, the person sends a rejection of the trusteeship to the settlor or, if the settlor is dead or lacks capacity, to the designated cotrustee, or, if none, to the successor trustee, or, if none, to a qualified beneficiary; and

inspect or investigate trust property to determine potential liability under environmental or other law or for any other purpose.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 20

, § 1.

OFFICIAL COMMENT

This section, which specifies the requirements for a valid acceptance of the trusteeship, implicates many of the same issues that arise in determining whether a trust has been revoked. Consequently, the two provisions track each other closely.
Compare
Section 701(a),

with

Section 602(c) (procedure for revoking or modifying trust). Procedures specified in the terms of the trust are recognized, but only substantial, not literal compliance is required. A failure to meet technical requirements, such as notarization of the trustee’s signature, does not result in a failure to accept. Ordinarily, the trustee will indicate acceptance by signing the trust instrument or signing a separate written instrument. However, this section validates any other method demonstrating the necessary intent, such as by knowingly exercising trustee powers, unless the terms of the trust make the specified method exclusive. This section also does not preclude an acceptance by estoppel. For general background on issues relating to trustee acceptance and rejection, see Restatement (Third) of Trusts § 35 (Tentative Draft No. 2, approved 1999); Restatement (Second) of Trusts § 102 (1959). Consistent with Section 201(b), which emphasizes that continuing judicial supervision of a trust is the rare exception, not the rule, the Uniform Trust Code does not require that a trustee qualify in court.

To avoid the inaction that can result if the person designated as trustee fails to communicate a decision either to accept or to reject the trusteeship, subsection (b) provides that a failure to accept within a reasonable time constitutes a rejection of the trusteeship. What will constitute a reasonable time depends on the facts and circumstances of the particular case. A major consideration is possible harm that might occur if a vacancy in a trusteeship is not filled in a timely manner. A trustee’s rejection normally precludes a later acceptance but does not cause the trust to fail.
See
Restatement (Third) of Trusts § 35 cmt. c (Tentative Draft No. 2, approved 1999). Regarding the filling of a vacancy in the event of a rejection, see Section 704.

A person designated as trustee who decides not to accept the trusteeship need not provide a formal rejection, but a clear and early communication is recommended. The appropriate recipient of the rejection depends upon the circumstances. Ordinarily, it would be appropriate to communicate the rejection to the person who informed the designee of the proposed trusteeship. If judicial proceedings involving the trust are pending, the rejection could be filed with the court. In the case of a person named as trustee of a revocable trust, it would be appropriate to communicate the rejection to the settlor. In any event, it would be best to inform a beneficiary with a significant interest in the trust because that beneficiary might be more motivated than others to seek appointment of a new trustee.

Subdivision (c)(1) makes clear that a nominated trustee may act expeditiously to protect the trust property without being considered to have accepted the trusteeship. However, upon conclusion of the intervention, the nominated trustee must send a rejection of office to the settlor, if living and competent, otherwise to a qualified beneficiary.

Because of the potential liability that can inhere in trusteeship, subdivision (c)(2) allows a person designated as trustee to inspect the trust property without accepting the trusteeship. The condition of real property is a particular concern, including possible tort liability for the condition of the premises or liability for violation of state or federal environmental laws such as CERCLA, 42 U.S.C. § 9607. For a provision limiting a trustee’s personal liability for obligations arising from ownership or control of trust property, see Section 1010(b).

§ 702.
Trustee’s bond.

A trustee shall give bond to secure performance of the trustee’s duties only if the Probate Division of the Superior Court finds that a bond is required by the terms of the trust and the Probate Division of the Superior Court has not dispensed with the requirement, or the Probate Division of the Superior Court finds by clear and convincing evidence that a bond is needed to protect the interests of the beneficiaries.

The Probate Division of the Superior Court may specify the amount of a bond, its liabilities, and whether sureties are necessary. The Probate Division of the Superior Court may modify or terminate a bond at any time.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 20

, § 1; amended

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 236, eff. February 1, 2011.

§ 703.
Cotrustees.

Cotrustees who are unable to reach a unanimous decision may act by majority decision.

If a vacancy occurs in a cotrusteeship, the remaining cotrustees may act for the trust.

A cotrustee must participate in the performance of a trustee’s function unless the cotrustee is unavailable to perform the function because of absence, illness, disqualification under other law, or other temporary incapacity, or the cotrustee has properly delegated the performance of the function to another trustee.

If a cotrustee is unavailable to perform duties because of absence, illness, disqualification under other law, or other temporary incapacity, and prompt action is necessary to achieve the purposes of the trust or to avoid injury to the trust property, the remaining cotrustee or a majority of the remaining cotrustees may act for the trust.

A trustee may not delegate to a cotrustee the performance of a function the settlor reasonably expected the trustees to perform jointly. Unless a delegation was irrevocable, a trustee may revoke a delegation previously made.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (g) of this section, a trustee who does not join in an action of another trustee is not liable for the action.

Each trustee shall exercise reasonable care to:

prevent a cotrustee from committing a serious breach of trust; and

compel a cotrustee to redress a serious breach of trust.

A dissenting trustee who joins in an action at the direction of the majority of the trustees and who notified in writing any cotrustee of the dissent at or before the time of the action is not liable for the action unless the action is a serious breach of trust.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 20

, § 1.

OFFICIAL COMMENT

This section contains most but not all of the Code’s provisions on cotrustees. Other provisions relevant to cotrustees include Sections 704 (vacancy in trusteeship need not be filled if cotrustee remains in office), 705 (notice of resignation must be given to cotrustee), 706 (lack of cooperation among cotrustees as ground for removal), 707 (obligations of resigning or removed trustee), 813 (reporting requirements upon vacancy in trusteeship), and 1013 (authority of cotrustees to authenticate documents.

Cotrustees are appointed for a variety of reasons. Having multiple decision-makers serves as a safeguard against eccentricity or misconduct. Cotrustees are often appointed to gain the advantage of differing skills, perhaps a financial institution for its permanence and professional skills, and a family member to maintain a personal connection with the beneficiaries. On other occasions, cotrustees are appointed to make certain that all family lines are represented in the trust’s management.

Cotrusteeship should not be called for without careful reflection. Division of responsibility among cotrustees is often confused, the accountability of any individual trustee is uncertain, obtaining consent of all trustees can be burdensome, and unless an odd number of trustees is named deadlocks requiring court resolution can occur. Potential problems can be reduced by addressing division of responsibilities in the terms of the trust. Like the other sections of this article, this section is freely subject to modification in the terms of the trust.
See
Section 105.

Much of this section is based on comparable provisions of the Restatement of Trusts, although with extensive modifications. Reference should also be made to ERISA § 405 (29 U.S.C. § 1105), which in recent years has been the statutory base for the most significant case law on the powers and duties of cotrustees.

Subsection (a) is in accord with Restatement (Third) of Trusts § 39 (Tentative Draft No. 2, approved 1999), which rejects the common law rule, followed in earlier Restatements, requiring unanimity among the trustees of a private trust.
See
Restatement (Second) of Trusts § 194 (1959). This section is consistent with the prior Restatement rule applicable to charitable trusts, which allowed for action by a majority of trustees. See Restatement (Second) of Trusts § 383 (1959).

Under subsection (b), a majority of the remaining trustees may act for the trust when a vacancy occurs in a cotrusteeship. Section 704 provides that a vacancy in a cotrusteeship need be filled only if there is no trustee remaining in office.

Pursuant to subsection (c), a cotrustee must participate in the performance of a trustee function unless the cotrustee has properly delegated performance to another cotrustee, or the cotrustee is unable to participate due to temporary incapacity or disqualification under other law. Other laws under which a cotrustee might be disqualified include federal securities law and the ERISA prohibited transactions rules. Subsection (d) authorizes a cotrustee to assume some or all of the functions of another trustee who is unavailable to perform duties as provided in subsection (c).

Subsection (e) addresses the extent to which a trustee may delegate the performance of functions to a cotrustee. The standard differs from the standard for delegation to an agent as provided in Section 807 because the two situations are different. Section 807, which is identical to Section 9 of the Uniform Prudent Investor Act, recognizes that many trustees are not professionals. Consequently, trustees should be encouraged to delegate functions they are not competent to perform. Subsection (e) is premised on the assumption that the settlor selected cotrustees for a specific reason and that this reason ought to control the scope of a permitted delegation to a cotrustee. Subsection (e) prohibits a trustee from delegating to another trustee functions the settlor reasonably expected the trustees to perform jointly. The exact extent to which a trustee may delegate functions to another trustee in a particular case will vary depending on the reasons the settlor decided to appoint cotrustees. The better practice is to address the division of functions in the terms of the trust, as allowed by Section 105. Subsection (e) is based on language derived from Restatement (Second) of Trusts § 171 (1959). This section of the Restatement Second, 3which applied to delegations to both agents and cotrustees, was superseded, as to delegation to agents, by Restatement (Third) of Trusts: Prudent Investor Rule § 171 (1992).

By permitting the trustees to act by a majority, this section contemplates that there may be a trustee or trustees who might dissent. Trustees who dissent from the acts of a cotrustee are in general protected from liability. Subsection (f) protects trustees who refused to join in the action. Subsection (h) protects a dissenting trustee who joined the action at the direction of the majority, such as to satisfy a demand of the other side to a transaction, if the trustee expressed the dissent to a cotrustee at or before the time of the action in question. However, the protections provided by subsections (f) and (h) no longer apply if the action constitutes a serious breach of trust. In that event, subsection (g) may impose liability against a dissenting trustee for failing to take reasonable steps to rectify the improper conduct. The responsibility to take action against a breaching cotrustee codifies the substance of Sections 184 and 224 of the Restatement (Second) of Trusts (1959).

§ 704.
Vacancy in trusteeship; appointment of successor.

A vacancy in a trusteeship occurs if:

a person designated as trustee rejects the trusteeship;

a person designated as trustee cannot be identified or does not exist;

a trustee resigns;

a trustee is disqualified or removed;

a trustee dies; or

a guardian is appointed for an individual serving as trustee.

If one or more cotrustees remain in office, a vacancy in a trusteeship need not be filled. A vacancy in a trusteeship must be filled if the trust has no remaining trustee.

A vacancy in a trusteeship of a noncharitable trust that is required to be filled must be filled in the following order of priority:

by a person designated in the terms of the trust to act as successor trustee;

by a person appointed by unanimous agreement of the qualified beneficiaries; or

by a person appointed by the Probate Division of the Superior Court.

A vacancy in a trusteeship of a charitable trust that is required to be filled must be filled in the following order of priority:

by a person designated in the terms of the trust to act as successor trustee; or

by a person appointed by the Probate Division of the Superior Court.

Whether or not a vacancy in a trusteeship exists or is required to be filled, the Probate Division of the Superior Court may appoint an additional trustee or special fiduciary whenever the Probate Division of the Superior Court considers the appointment necessary for the administration of the trust.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 20

, § 1; amended

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 236, eff. February 1, 2011.

OFFICIAL COMMENT

This section lists the ways in which a trusteeship becomes vacant and the rules on filling the vacancy.
See also
Sections 701 (accepting or declining trusteeship), 705 (resignation), and 706 (removal). Good drafting practice suggests that the terms of the trust deal expressly with the problem of vacancies, naming successors and specifying the procedure for filling vacancies. This section applies only if the terms of the trust fail to specify a procedure.

The disqualification of a trustee referred to in subdivision (a)(4) would include a financial institution whose right to engage in trust business has been revoked or removed. Such disqualification might also occur if the trust’s principal place of administration is transferred to a jurisdiction in which the trustee, whether an individual or institution, is not qualified to act.

Subsection (b) provides that a vacancy in the cotrusteeship must be filled only if the trust has no remaining trustee. If a vacancy in the cotrusteeship is not filled, Section 703 authorizes the remaining cotrustees to continue to administer the trust. However, as provided in subsection (e), the court, exercising its inherent equity authority, may always appoint additional trustees if the appointment would promote better administration of the trust.
See
Restatement (Third) of Trusts Section 34 cmt. e (Tentative Draft No. 2, approved 1999); Restatement (Second) of Trusts Section 108 cmt. e (1959).

Subsection (c) provides a procedure for filling a vacancy in the trusteeship of a noncharitable trust. Absent an effective provision in the terms of the trust, subdivision (c)(2) permits a vacancy in the trusteeship to be filled, without the need for court approval, by a person selected by unanimous agreement of the qualified beneficiaries. An effective provision in the terms of the trust for the designation of a successor trustee includes a procedure under which the successor trustee is selected by a person designated in those terms. Pursuant to Section 705(a)(1), the qualified beneficiaries may also receive the trustee’s resignation. If a trustee resigns following notice as provided in Section 705, the trust may be transferred to a successor appointed pursuant to subdivision (c)(2) of this section, all without court involvement. A nonqualified beneficiary who is displeased with the choice of the qualified beneficiaries may petition the court for removal of the trustee under Section 706.

If the qualified beneficiaries fail to make an appointment, subdivision (c)(3) authorizes the court to fill the vacancy. In making the appointment, the court should consider the objectives and probable intention of the settlor, the promotion of the proper administration of the trust, and the interests and wishes of the beneficiaries.
See
Restatement (Third) of Trusts Section 34 cmt. f (Tentative Draft No. 2, approved 1999); Restatement (Second) of Trusts Section 108 cmt. d (1959).

Subsection (d) specifies a procedure for filling a vacancy in the trusteeship of a charitable trust. Absent an effective designation in the terms of the trust, a successor trustee may be selected by the charitable organizations expressly designated to receive distributions in the terms of the trust but only if the attorney general concurs in the selection. If the attorney general does not concur in the selection, however, or if the trust does not designate a charitable organization to receive distributions, the vacancy may be filled only by the court. For the reason why the reference to the Attorney General is placed in brackets, see 2004 Amendment below.

In the case of a revocable trust, the appointment of a successor will normally be made directly by the settlor. As to the duties of a successor trustee with respect to the actions of a predecessor, see Section 812.

§ 705.
Resignation of trustee.

A trustee may resign:

upon at least 30 days’ notice in writing to all cotrustees and to the qualified beneficiaries except those qualified beneficiaries under a revocable trust which the settlor has the capacity to revoke; or

with the approval of the Probate Division of the Superior Court.

In approving a resignation, the Probate Division of the Superior Court may issue orders and impose conditions reasonably necessary for the protection of the trust property.

Any liability of a resigning trustee or of any sureties on the trustee’s bond for acts or omissions of the trustee is not discharged or affected by the trustee’s resignation.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 20

, § 1; amended

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 236, eff. Feb. 1, 2011.

§ 706.
Removal and replacement of trustee.

The settlor, a cotrustee, or a beneficiary may request the probate division of the superior court to remove a trustee under subsection (b) of this section or to replace a trustee under subsection (c) of this section. A trustee may be removed by the Probate Division of the Superior Court on its own initiative.

The Probate Division of the Superior Court may remove a trustee if:

the trustee is obviously unsuitable;

the trustee has committed a serious breach of trust;

lack of cooperation among cotrustees substantially impairs the administration of the trust;

because of unfitness, unwillingness, or persistent failure of the trustee to administer the trust effectively, the court determines that removal of the trustee best serves the interests of the beneficiaries;

there has been a substantial change of circumstances or removal is requested by all of the qualified beneficiaries, the Probate Division of the Superior Court finds that removal of the trustee best serves the interests of all of the beneficiaries and is not inconsistent with a material purpose of the trust, and a suitable cotrustee or successor trustee is available;

for any cause, if the interests of the trust estate require it.

The Probate Division of the Superior Court may remove an existing trustee, and appoint a replacement trustee subject to the provisions of section 704 of this title, if the Probate Division of the Superior Court finds that a change in trustee would be in keeping with the intent of the settlor. In deciding whether to replace a trustee under this subsection, the Probate Division of the Superior Court may consider the following factors:

Whether removal would substantially improve or benefit the administration of the trust;

The relationship between the settlor and the trustee as it existed at the time the trust was created;

Changes in the nature of the trustee since the creation of the trust;

The relationship between the trustee and the beneficiaries;

The responsiveness of the trustee to the beneficiaries;

The experience and skill level of the trustee;

The investment performance of the trustee;

The charges for services performed by the trustee; and

Any other relevant factors pertaining to the administration of the trust.

A Probate Division of the Superior Court may order trustees who are replaced pursuant to an action brought under subsection (c) of this section to reimburse the trust for attorney’s fees and court costs paid by the trust relating to the action.

Pending a final decision on a request to remove a trustee, or in lieu of or in addition to removing a trustee, the Probate Division of the Superior Court may order such appropriate relief under subsection 1001(b) of this title as may be necessary to protect the trust property or the interests of the beneficiaries.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 20

, § 1; amended

2009, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 8;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 236, eff. Feb.1, 2011.

§ 707.
Delivery of property by former trustee.

Unless a cotrustee remains in office or the Probate Division of the Superior Court otherwise orders, and until the trust property is delivered to a successor trustee or other person entitled to it, a trustee who has resigned or been removed has the duties of a trustee and the powers necessary to protect the trust property.

A trustee who has resigned or been removed shall proceed expeditiously to deliver the trust property within the trustee’s possession to the cotrustee, successor trustee, or other person entitled to it.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 20

, § 1; amended

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 236, eff. February 1, 2011.

§ 708.
Compensation of trustee.

If the terms of a trust do not specify the trustee’s compensation, a trustee is entitled to compensation that is reasonable under the circumstances.

If the terms of a trust specify the trustee’s compensation, the trustee is entitled to be compensated as specified, but the Probate Division of the Superior Court may allow more or less compensation if:

the duties of the trustee are substantially different from those contemplated when the trust was created; or

the compensation specified by the terms of the trust would be unreasonably low or high.

Factors for the Probate Division of the Superior Court to consider in deciding upon a trustee’s compensation shall include:
(c) (1) Factors for the Probate Division of the Superior Court to consider in deciding upon a trustee’s compensation shall include:

the size of the trust;

the nature and number of the assets;

the results obtained;

the time and responsibility required;

the expertise required;

any management or sale of real property or closely held business interests;

any involvement in litigation to protect the trust property;

the fee customarily charged in the locality for similar services;

the experience, reputation, and ability of the person performing the services;

the effect that the particular employment may have on the ability of the person employed to engage in other employment;

the time limitations imposed by the trustee or by the circumstances; and

other relevant factors.

The order of the factors in this subsection does not imply their relative importance.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 20

, § 1; amended

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 236, eff. February 1, 2011.

§ 709.
Reimbursement of expenses.

A trustee is entitled to be reimbursed out of the trust property, with reasonable interest as appropriate, for:

expenses that were properly incurred in the administration of the trust; and

to the extent necessary to prevent unjust enrichment of the trust, expenses that were not properly incurred in the administration of the trust.

An advance by the trustee of money for the protection of the trust gives rise to a lien against trust property to secure reimbursement with reasonable interest.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 20

, § 1.

OFFICIAL COMMENT

A trustee has the authority to expend trust funds as necessary in the administration of the trust, including expenses incurred in the hiring of agents.
See
Sections 807 (delegation by trustee) and subdivision 816(15) (trustee to pay expenses of administration from trust).

Subdivision (a)(1) clarifies that a trustee is entitled to reimbursement from the trust for incurring expenses within the trustee’s authority. The trustee may also withhold appropriate reimbursement for expenses before making distributions to the beneficiaries.
See
Restatement (Third) of Trusts § 38 cmt. b (Tentative Draft No. 2, approved 1999); Restatement (Second) of Trusts § 244 cmt. b (1959). A trustee is ordinarily not entitled to reimbursement for incurring unauthorized expenses. Such expenses are normally the personal responsibility of the trustee.

As provided in subdivision (a)(2), a trustee is entitled to reimbursement for unauthorized expenses only if the unauthorized expenditures benefitted the trust The purpose of this provision, which is derived from Restatement (Second) of Trusts § 245 (1959), is not to ratify the unauthorized conduct of the trustee, but to prevent unjust enrichment of the trust. Given this purpose, a court, on appropriate grounds, may delay or even deny reimbursement for expenses which benefitted the trust. Appropriate grounds include: (1) whether the trustee acted in bad faith in incurring the expense; (2) whether the trustee knew that the expense was inappropriate; (3) whether the trustee reasonably believed the expense was necessary for the preservation of the trust estate; (4) whether the expense has resulted in a benefit; and (5) whether indemnity can be allowed without defeating or impairing the purposes of the trust.
See
Restatement (Second) of Trusts § 245 cmt. g (1959).

Subsection (b) implements subdivision 802(h)(5), which creates an exception to the duty of loyalty for advances by the trustee for the protection of the trust if the transaction is fair to the beneficiaries.

Reimbursement under this section may include attorney’s fees and expenses incurred by the trustee in defending an action. However, a trustee is not ordinarily entitled to attorney’s fees and expenses if it is determined that the trustee breached the trust.
See
3A Austin W. Scott & William F. Fratcher, The Law of Trusts § 245 (4th ed. 1988).